South Dakota, session 2026, SB190.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That a NEW SECTION be added to a NEW CHAPTER in title 26:
A state agency or any political subdivision of this state may not substantially
burden the fundamental right of a parent to direct the upbringing, education, health care,
and mental health of the parent's minor child, without demonstrating that the burden
imposed on the parent is required by a compelling governmental interest as applied to the
parent and the parent's minor child and is the least restrictive means for furthering that
compelling governmental interest.
Section 2. That a NEW SECTION be added to a NEW CHAPTER in title 26:
The right of a parent with regard to the parent's minor child include the right to:
(1) Direct the upbringing of the parent's minor child;
(2) Direct the moral and religious training of the parent's minor child;
(3) Except as otherwise provided in section 5 of this Act, make and consent to all
physical and mental health care decisions for the parent's minor child;
(4) Access and review all medical records of the parent's minor child;
(5) Direct the education of the parent's minor child;
(6) Access and review all written and electronic educational records relating to the
parent's minor child, which are in the possession of a school, as provided in section
7 of this Act;
(7) Have the parent's minor child excused from school attendance for religious
purposes;
(8) Participate in parent-teacher organizations and other school organizations
sanctioned by the board of a school district;
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.713.12 2 190
(9) Be notified promptly if an employee of the state reasonably believes that abuse,
neglect, or other criminal offense has been committed against the parent's minor
child by someone other than the parent, unless doing so would interfere with a
criminal or other investigation;
(10) Consent before a biometric scan of the parent's minor child is performed, shared,
or stored;
(11) Consent before any record of the blood or deoxyribonucleic acid of the parent's
minor child is created, stored, or shared, unless authorized pursuant to a court
order; and
(12) Consent before any state agency or political subdivision of this state makes a video
or audio recording of the minor child, unless the video or audio recording is made
as part of:
(a) A court proceeding;
(b) A law enforcement investigation;
(c) An interview conducted as part of a criminal or other investigation;
(d) A surveillance or other security system;
(e) A photographic identification card; or
(f) A public event where the minor child has no reasonable expectation of
privacy.
Nothing in this section may be construed to permit a parent to abuse or neglect
the parent's minor child, as defined in § 26-8A-2, or to end the life of the parent's minor
child.
Section 3. That a NEW SECTION be added to a NEW CHAPTER in title 26:
Except for a law enforcement officer in the conduct of a criminal investigation or
as otherwise provided by law, an employee of this state or a political subdivision of the
state may not:
(1) Encourage or coerce a minor child to withhold information from the minor child's
parent; or
(2) Withhold from a minor child's parent information that is relevant to the physical,
emotional, or mental health of the parent's minor child.
Section 4. That a NEW SECTION be added to a NEW CHAPTER in title 26:
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.713.12 3 190
Except as provided in section 5 of this Act, a person, private entity, state agency,
political subdivision of this state, or employee of a state agency or political subdivision
must obtain the consent of a minor child's parent before:
(1) Procuring, soliciting, arranging, providing a referral for, or performing:
(a) A surgical procedure upon the minor child;
(b) A medical examination of the minor child;
(c) A mental health evaluation, in a clinical or nonclinical setting, of the minor
child; or
(d) Any mental health treatment for the minor child; or
(2) Prescribing or dispensing any prescription medication to the minor child.
A parent may provide a person, entity, state agency, political subdivision of this
state, or employee of a state agency or political subdivision written, informed consent to
perform an action requiring consent, pursuant to this section.
Section 5. That a NEW SECTION be added to a NEW CHAPTER in title 26:
Notwithstanding the requirements of section 4 of this Act, a licensed physician or
other health professional, acting within the professional's scope of practice, may:
(1) Perform an examination of a minor child to determine whether, in the opinion of
the treating physician or health professional, exercising competent medical
judgement, the minor child requires emergency medical care and services; or
(2) Perform any of the actions listed in section 4 of this Act to a minor child without
the consent of the minor child's parent if:
(a) The licensed physician or health professional is permitted to perform the
action under § 20-9-4.2;
(b) The minor is accompanied by an individual who has documentation signed
by the minor child's parent authorizing the individual to make decisions
regarding the minor child's health care; or
(c) The licensed physician or health professional relies in good faith on the
representation of an individual, that the individual has been granted
authority by the minor child's parent to make decisions regarding the minor
child's health.
Section 6. That a NEW SECTION be added to a NEW CHAPTER in title 26:
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.713.12 4 190
The board of a school district, shall, in consultation with parents, teachers, and
administrators, adopt a policy to promote the involvement of parents of minor children
enrolled in the school district. The policy must include:
(1) A plan for parent participation in the school to improve parent and teacher
cooperation in areas of homework, attendance, and discipline; and
(2) The process by which a parent:
(a) Reviews the curriculum offered to the parent's minor child or is otherwise
informed about the course of study provided to the parent's minor child;
(b) May learn about the nature and purpose of clubs or other extracurricular
activities that have been approved by the school;
(c) Withdraws the parent's minor child from a school club or extracurricular
activity;
(d) Is notified of, and consents to having the parent's minor child receive, any
instruction in or presentation on human sexuality, human sexual behavior,
an understanding of an individual's identity disconnected from or
inconsistent with the biological reality of an individual's sex, or the idea that
an individual is able to identify with a gender that corresponds to an
individual's internal and subjective sense of self, disconnected from the
biological reality of the minor's sex;
(e) May object to any specific instruction or presentation provided to the
parent's minor child;
(f) May withdraw the parent's minor child from any specific instruction or
presentation if the parent considers the instruction or presentation harmful
to the parent's minor child; and
(g) Provides consent before the parent's minor child may use a name or
nickname other than the minor child's legal name or a derivative or
diminutive of the minor child's legal name.
Section 7. That a NEW SECTION be added to a NEW CHAPTER in title 26:
Except as provided in § 26-8A-13, a school district shall allow the parent of a minor
child enrolled in the school district to access all written and electronic records concerning
the parent's minor child that are in the possession of the school district, a district
employee, or other person hired, contracted, or authorized by the school district to provide
services to the parent's minor child.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.713.12 5 190
Section 8. That a NEW SECTION be added to a NEW CHAPTER in title 26:
Except as provided in § 26-8A-13, an employee of a school district may not
withhold or conceal information from or facilitate, encourage, or coerce a minor child to
withhold or conceal information from, the minor child's parent about the minor child's:
(1) Curricular or extracurricular projects, assignments, or activities;
(2) Physical, emotional, or mental health; or
(3) Purported identification with a gender that corresponds to the minor child's internal
and subjective sense of self, disconnected from the biological reality of the minor
child's sex.
Section 9. That a NEW SECTION be added to a NEW CHAPTER in title 26:
A parent may submit a written complaint to the board of a school district, detailing
any violation of sections 6 to 8, inclusive, of this Act. The parent is entitled to a meeting
with the superintendent of the school district to discuss the complaint. The superintendent
shall investigate the complaint and respond to the parent in writing within fourteen days
of receiving the complaint. The response provided by the superintendent must describe
the actions that the district is to take in order to remedy the parent's complaint.
A parent may appeal the actions of the superintendent to the board of the school
district by submitting a written complaint detailing the violation of sections 6 to 8, inclusive
of this Act and a description of how the actions taken by the superintendent failed to
resolve the complaint. The board shall investigate the complaint and shall meet with the
parent to discuss the complaint. The board shall adopt a plan of action to remedy the
complaint at the first meeting of the board following receipt of the complaint.
If the board's plan of action does not remedy the parent's complaint, the parent
may file suit and assert a violation of sections 6 to 8, inclusive, of this Act as a claim
against the school district. A parent who successfully asserts a claim or defense under this
section may recover declaratory relief, injunctive relief, liquidated damages of five
thousand dollars per violation, reasonable attorneys' fees and costs, and any other
appropriate relief.
Section 10. That a NEW SECTION be added to a NEW CHAPTER in title 26:
For the purposes of sections 6 to 9, inclusive, of this Act, "school district" does not
include any public institution of higher education, provided that the parent of a minor child
retains the parent's rights under this Act and any other applicable federal law, as applied
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.713.12 6 190
to a school district, if the parent's child is enrolled in a dual enrollment course offered by
the school district and a public institution of higher education.
Section 11. That a NEW SECTION be added to a NEW CHAPTER in title 26:
A parent may bring suit for a violation of this chapter and may raise this chapter
as a defense in any judicial or administrative proceeding, without regard to whether the
proceeding is brought by or in the name of the state, a private person, or other party.
A parent who successfully asserts a claim or defense under this chapter may
recover declaratory relief, injunctive relief, compensatory damages, reasonable attorneys'
fees and costs, and any other appropriate relief.
A state agency or political subdivision of this state shall indemnify the employees
of the state or political subdivision for any liability incurred by the employee and for any
judgement entered against the employee for claims arising under this chapter. A state
agency or political subdivision of this state is not required to indemnify an employee if the
employee was convicted of a criminal violation for the conduct from which the claim arises.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.